Vermont, session 2025-2026, H72.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6618 is amended to read:
§ 6618. WASTE MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE FUND
* * *
(b) The Secretary may authorize disbursements from the Solid Waste
Management Assistance Account for the purpose of enhancing solid waste
VT LEG #379236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.72
2025 Page 2 of 6
management in the State in accordance with the adopted waste management
plan. This includes:
* * *
(11) Grants to municipalities for soil testing and cleanup on properties
foreclosed upon pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 9. Grants issued pursuant to
this subdivision shall not exceed $250,000.00.
* * *
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 2201 is amended to read:
§ 2201. THROWING, DEPOSITING, BURNING, AND DUMPING
REFUSE; PENALTY; SUMMONS AND COMPLAINT
* * *
(b) Prosecution of violations.
(1) A person who violates a provision of this section commits a civil
violation and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $800.00.
(2) A person who violates a provision of this section may be required to
dispose of all materials improperly disposed of at a solid waste management
facility. Failure to comply with this subdivision shall result in a fine of not
more than $100.00 per day.
(c) Procedure.
(1) This violation shall be enforceable in the Judicial Bureau pursuant to
the provisions of 4 V.S.A. chapter 29 in an action that may be brought by a
VT LEG #379236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.72
2025 Page 3 of 6
municipal attorney, a solid waste management district attorney, an
environmental enforcement officer employed by the Agency of Natural
Resources, a designee of the legislative body of the municipality, or any duly
authorized law enforcement officer.
* * *
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting the operation
of an automobile graveyard or salvage yard as defined in section 2241 of this
title permitted in accordance with subchapter 10 of this chapter, nor shall
anything in this section be construed as prohibiting the installation and use of
appropriate receptacles for solid waste provided by the State or towns.
(4) Unpaid civil penalties or fines that are imposed pursuant to this
section shall constitute a lien on the property in the same manner and to the
same extent as taxes assessed on the grand list, and all procedures and
remedies for the collection of taxes shall apply to the collection of the penalties
or fines.
(c)(d) Roadside cleanup. A person found in violation of this section may
be assigned to spend up to 80 hours collecting trash or litter from a specified
segment of roadside or from a specified area of public property.
(d) [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #379236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.72
2025 Page 4 of 6
Sec. 3. 24 V.S.A. § 2241 is amended to read:
§ 2241. DEFINITIONS
* * *
(16) “Unauthorized salvage yard” means any place of outdoor storage or
deposit for storing, keeping, processing, buying, or selling junk, as a scrap
metal processing facility, or as an automobile graveyard operating for more
than 90 days without certification as required by section 2242 of this title.
Sec. 4. 24 V.S.A. § 2246 is amended to read:
§ 2246. EFFECT OF LOCAL ORDINANCES
(a) This subchapter shall not be construed to be in derogation of zoning
ordinances or ordinances for the control of salvage yards now or hereafter
established within the proper exercise of the police power granted to
municipalities, if those ordinances impose stricter limitations upon salvage
yards. If the limitations imposed by this subchapter are stricter, this subchapter
shall control.
(b) The legislative body of a municipality may adopt an ordinance pursuant
to subdivision 2291(31) of this title to extend the regulatory authority
established in this subchapter to any premises that constitutes a public nuisance
due to the accumulation of rubbish, scrap, junk, or abandoned vehicles,
provided that the ordinance shall otherwise be consistent with this subchapter.
VT LEG #379236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.72
2025 Page 5 of 6
Sec. 5. 24 V.S.A. § 2282 is amended to read:
§ 2282. PENALTY
(a) A person who violates this subchapter shall be fined by the legislative
body not less than $5.00 nor more than $50.00 for each day of the violation. A
person who violates the requirements of this subchapter shall be fined by the
Agency of Natural Resources in accordance with 10 V.S.A. chapter 201.
(b) Unpaid civil penalties or fines that are imposed on an unauthorized
salvage yard premises shall constitute a lien on the property pursuant to
subdivision 2201(c)(4) of this title.
Sec. 6. 24 V.S.A. § 2291 is amended to read:
§ 2291. ENUMERATION OF POWERS
For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, welfare, and
convenience, a town, city, or incorporated village shall have the following
powers:
* * *
(31) To extend the regulation of salvage yards, pursuant to section 2246
of this title, to any premises that constitutes a public nuisance due to the
accumulation of rubbish, scrap, junk, or abandoned vehicles. The municipality
may determine that a premises constitutes a public nuisance when it interferes
with common public rights in a manner that endangers the property or the
health and safety of a considerable number of persons for a period of 90 days
VT LEG #379236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.72
2025 Page 6 of 6
or more without authorization pursuant to section 2242 of this title. The
legislative body may direct the property owner to clean any premises that does
not receive a certificate of approved location pursuant to section 2242 of this
title, provided that the legislative body has adopted rules to define what
constitutes a public nuisance in this context and includes provisions for notice
in accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 5252(a)(3) to the property owner prior to
imposing penalties or fines. Any unpaid civil penalties or fines imposed
pursuant to this subdivision shall constitute a lien on the property in the same
manner and to the same extent as taxes assessed on the grand list, and all
procedures and remedies for the collection of taxes shall apply to the collection
of those expenses.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379236 v.1